Colorado, session 2026A, HB1048.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 39-26-735 as
follows:
39-26-735. Back-to-school items - tax preference performance
statement - rules - legislative declaration - definitions - repeal.
(1) IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 39-21-304 (1), WHICH
REQUIRES EACH BILL THAT CREATES A NEW TAX EXPENDITURE TO INCLUDE
A TAX PREFERENCE PERFORMANCE STATEMENT AS PART OF A STATUTORY
LEGISLATIVE DECLARATION, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY HEREBY FINDS AND
DECLARES THAT:
(a) THE GENERAL LEGISLATIVE PURPOSE OF THE EXEMPTION
ALLOWED BY THIS SECTION IS TO PROVIDE TAX RELIEF TO CERTAIN
INDIVIDUALS;
(b) THE SPECIFIC LEGISLATIVE PURPOSE OF THE EXEMPTION
ALLOWED BY THIS SECTION IS TO INCREASE THE AFFORDABILITY OF
BACK-TO-SCHOOL ITEMS AND TO REDRESS THE BURDEN THAT THE
IMPOSITION OF SALES TAX PLACES ON MILLIONS OF PARENTS AND OTHER
CAREGIVERS FOR YOUNG CHILDREN IN COLORADO FOR WHOM SUCH
BACK-TO-SCHOOL ITEMS ARE ESSENTIAL; AND
(c) TO ALLOW THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY AND THE STATE AUDITOR
TO MEASURE THE EFFECTIVENESS OF THE EXEMPTION ALLOWED BY THIS
SECTION, THE STATE AUDITOR, IN COLLABORATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT
-2- HB26-1048

PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (6) OF THIS SECTION, SHALL IDENTIFY
AVAILABLE DATA SOURCES AND ESTIMATE THE SAVINGS THAT THE
EXEMPTION FOR BACK-TO-SCHOOL ITEMS PROVIDES TO TAXPAYERS IN
COLORADO FOR WHOM BACK-TO-SCHOOL ITEMS ARE ESSENTIAL DURING
THE STATE AUDITOR'S EVALUATION OF THE EXEMPTION PURSUANT TO
SECTION 39-21-305.
(2) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(a) "BACK-TO-SCHOOL ITEM" MEANS AN ARTICLE OF CLOTHING, A
SCHOOL SUPPLY, OR A LEARNING AID THAT IS PURCHASED PRIMARILY FOR
USE BY A MINOR.
(b) "CLOTHING" MEANS:
(I) ANY ARTICLE OF APPAREL INTENDED TO BE WORN ON AN
INDIVIDUAL, EXCLUDING A CLOTHING ACCESSORY; AND
(II) ANY FOOTWEAR, EXCLUDING SKIS, SNOWBOARDS, SWIM FINS,
ROLLER BLADES, SKATES, AND OTHER RECREATIONAL EQUIPMENT.
(c) "CLOTHING ACCESSORY" MEANS AN INCIDENTAL ITEM WORN
ON AN INDIVIDUAL OR USED IN CONJUNCTION WITH CLOTHING. "CLOTHING
ACCESSORY" INCLUDES JEWELRY, WALLETS, WATCHES, HATS, SCARVES,
HOSIERY, TIES, BELTS, AND UMBRELLAS.
(d) "DEPARTMENT" MEANS THE DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE.
(e) "EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR" MEANS THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF
THE DEPARTMENT.
(f) "LEARNING AID" MEANS A BOOK OR TOY INTENDED TO TEACH
SKILLS TO CHILDREN, INCLUDING A SET OF STACKING OR NESTING BLOCKS,
FLASH CARDS OR OTHER LEARNING CARDS, A MATCHING OR MEMORY
GAME, A PUZZLE BOOK OR A SEARCH-AND-FIND BOOK, OR AN INTERACTIVE
-3- HB26-1048

OR ELECTRONIC BOOK.
(g) "SCHOOL SUPPLY" MEANS AN ART SUPPLY, BACKPACK, BINDER
POCKET, BINDER, BLACKBOARD CHALK, CALCULATOR, CELLOPHANE TAPE,
CLAY AND GLAZE, COMPASS, COMPOSITION BOOK, CRAYON SET,
DICTIONARY OR THESAURUS, DRY ERASE MARKER AND ERASER, FOLDER,
GLUE AND PASTE, HIGHLIGHTER, INDEX CARD SET AND BOX, LUNCH BOX,
MAP OR GLOBE, MARKER, NOTEBOOK AND DIVIDER, PAPER OR PAD, PENCIL
BOX OR OTHER BOXES FOR SCHOOL SUPPLIES, PENCIL SHARPENER, PENCIL
AND ERASER, PEN, PROTRACTOR, REFERENCE BOOK, RULER, SCISSORS,
TEXTBOOK, OR WORKBOOK.
(3) (a) COMMENCING WITH THE FORTY-EIGHT-HOUR PERIOD
BEGINNING AT 11:59 P.M. ON JULY 23, 2027, AND ENDING AT 11:59 P.M. ON
JULY 25, 2027, AND FOR THE FORTY-EIGHT-HOUR PERIODS BEGINNING AT
11:59 P.M. ON JULY 28, 2028, AND ENDING AT 11:59 P.M. ON JULY 30,
2028, AND BEGINNING AT 11:59 P.M. ON JULY 27, 2029, AND ENDING AT
11:59 P.M. ON JULY 29, 2029, THE SALE OF BACK-TO-SCHOOL ITEMS PRICED
LESS THAN THE LIMIT ESTABLISHED IN SUBSECTION (3)(b) OF THIS SECTION
IS EXEMPT FROM THE SALES TAX LEVIED PURSUANT TO PART 1 OF THIS
ARTICLE 26.
(b) THE LIMIT FOR EACH BACK-TO-SCHOOL ITEM IS:
(I) ONE HUNDRED DOLLARS FOR AN ARTICLE OF CLOTHING;
(II) FIFTY DOLLARS FOR A SCHOOL SUPPLY; AND
(III) THIRTY DOLLARS FOR A LEARNING AID.
(4) THE STORAGE, USE, OR CONSUMPTION OF A BACK-TO-SCHOOL
ITEM THAT IS EXEMPT AT THE TIME OF PURCHASE FROM SALES TAX
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (3) OF THIS SECTION IS EXEMPT FROM THE USE
TAX LEVIED PURSUANT TO PART 2 OF THIS ARTICLE 26.
-4- HB26-1048

(5) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR MAY:
(a) MODIFY EXISTING FORMS OR CREATE NEW FORMS AS
NECESSARY TO FACILITATE THE EXEMPTION CREATED IN THIS SECTION;
AND
(b) ADOPT RULES FOR THE ADMINISTRATION AND ENFORCEMENT
OF THIS SECTION.
(6) THE DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE STATE
AUDITOR, SHALL COLLECT THE INFORMATION NECESSARY FOR THE STATE
AUDITOR TO MEASURE THE EFFECTIVENESS OF THE EXEMPTION CREATED
IN THIS SECTION AS REQUIRED BY SUBSECTION (1)(c) OF THIS SECTION.
(7) THIS SECTION IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE DECEMBER 31, 2033.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 29-2-105, amend (1)
introductory portion, (1)(d)(I)(T), and (1)(d)(I)(U); and add (1)(d)(I)(V)
as follows:
29-2-105. Contents of sales tax ordinances and proposals.
(1) The sales tax ordinance or proposal of any incorporated town,
city, or county adopted pursuant to this article 2 shall MUST be imposed
on the sale of tangible personal property at retail or the furnishing of
services, as provided in subsection (1)(d) of this section. Any countywide
or incorporated town or city sales tax ordinance or proposal shall MUST
include the following provisions:
(d) (I) A provision that the sale of tangible personal property and
services taxable pursuant to this article 2 is the same as the sale of
tangible personal property and services taxable pursuant to section
39-26-104, except as otherwise provided in this subsection (1)(d). The
sale of tangible personal property and services taxable pursuant to this
article 2 is subject to the same sales tax exemptions as those specified in
-5- HB26-1048

part 7 of article 26 of title 39; except that the sale of the following may be
exempted from a town, city, or county sales tax only by the express
inclusion of the exemption either at the time of adoption of the initial
sales tax ordinance or resolution or by amendment thereto:
(T) The exemption for sales of heat pump systems and heat pump
water heaters set forth in section 39-26-732; and
(U) The exemption for sales of energy storage systems set forth
in section 39-26-733; AND
(V) THE EXEMPTION FOR BACK-TO-SCHOOL ITEMS SPECIFIED IN
SECTION 39-26-735 (3), FOR THE SAME PERIODS THAT THE STATE
EXEMPTION IS AVAILABLE.
SECTION 3. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly; except
that, if a referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V
of the state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this
act within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take
effect unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the
official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
-6- HB26-1048